New Jersey, session 221, S840.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.54A:2-1 is amended to read as follows: 54A:2-1. Imposition of tax. There is hereby imposed a tax for each taxable year (which shall be the same as the taxable year for federal income tax purposes) on the New Jersey gross income as herein defined of every individual, estate or trust (other than a charitable trust or a trust forming part of a pension or profit-sharing plan), subject to the deductions, limitations and modifications hereinafter provided, determined in accordance with the following tables with respect to taxpayers' taxable income: a.     For married individuals filing a joint return and individuals filing as head of household or as surviving spouse for federal income tax purposes: (1)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991 but before January 1, 1994: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . .                 2% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . .                  $400.00 plus 2.5% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . .                  $1,150.00 plus 3.5% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . .                  $1,850.00 plus 5.0% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . .               $2,350.00 plus 6.5% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 . . . . . . . .             $6,900.00 plus 7.0% of the excess over $150,000.00 (2)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994 but before January 1, 1995: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . .                   1.900% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . .                    $380.00 plus 2.375% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . .                    $1,092.50 plus 3.325% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . .                    $1,757.50 plus 4.750% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . .                  $2,232.50 plus 6.175% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .               $6,555.00 plus 6.650% of the excess over $150,000.00 (3)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995 but before January 1, 1996: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . .                 1.700% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . .                  $340.00 plus 2.125% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . .                  $977.50 plus 2.975% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . .                  $1,572.50 plus 4.250% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . .               $1,997.50 plus 6.013% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .               $6,206.60 plus 6.580% of the excess over $150,000.00 (4)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996 but before January 1, 2004: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . .                  $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . .                  $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . .                  $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . .               $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 . . . . . . . .             $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 (5)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004 but before January 1, 2018: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . . . .           1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . . . .             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . . . . .           $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . . . .             $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .           $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . . .             $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 . . . . . . . .             $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 (6)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . . . .           1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . . . .             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . . . . .           $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . . . .             $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .           $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . . .             $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $5,000,000.00 . . . . . . . .      $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $5,000,000.00 . . . . . . . . $431,457.50 plus 10.75% of the                                                        excess over $5,000,000.00 (7)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before January 1, 2022: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . . . .           1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00 . . . . . . .             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . . . . .           $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . . . .             $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .           $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . . .             $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $1,000,000.00 . . . . . . . .      $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $1,000,000.00 . . . . . . . . $72,657.50 plus 10.75% of the                                                           excess over $1,000,000.00 (8)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $40,000.00 . . . . . . .           1.400% of taxable income Over $40,000.00 but not over $70,000.00 . . . . . . .             $560.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00 . . . . . . .             $1,085.00 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00 . . . . . . .           $1,435.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . . .             $5,302.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $1,000,000.00 . . . . . . . .      $27,597.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $1,000,000.00 . . . . . . . .          $72,447.50 plus 10.75% of the excess over $1,000,000.00 b.   For married individuals filing separately, unmarried individuals other than individuals filing as head of household or as a surviving spouse for federal income tax purposes, and estates and trusts: (1)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991 but before January 1, 1994: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               2% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $400.00 plus 2.5% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $775.00 plus 5.0% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $1,025.00 plus 6.5% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 . . . . . . . .               $3,300.00 plus 7.0% of the excess over $75,000.00 (2)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994 but before January 1, 1995: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.900% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $380.00 plus 2.375% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $736.25 plus 4.750% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $973.75 plus 6.175% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 . . . . . . . .               $3,135.00 plus 6.650% of the excess over $75,000.00 (3)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995 but before January 1, 1996: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.700% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $340.00 plus 2.125% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $658.75 plus 4.250% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $871.25 plus 6.013% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 . . . . .                     $2,975.80 plus 6.580% of the excess over $75,000.00 (4)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996 but before January 1, 2004: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $542.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $717.50 plus 5.525% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 . . . . .                     $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the excess over $75,000.00 (5)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004 but before January 1, 2018: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $542.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $717.50 plus 5.525% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . .               $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 . . . . .                   $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 (6)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $542.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $717.50 plus 5.525% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . .               $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $5,000,000.00 . . . . .            $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $5,000,000.00 . . . . .                $433,373.75 plus 10.75% of the                                                             excess over $5,000,000.00 (7)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00 . . . . .               1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00 . . . . .                  $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00 . . . . .                  $542.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00 . . . . .                  $717.50 plus 5.525% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00 . . . . .               $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $1,000,000.00 . . . . .            $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $1,000,000.00 . . . . .                $74,573.75 plus 10.75% of the                                                             excess over $1,000,000.00 c.     For the purposes of this section, an individual who would be eligible to file as a head of household for federal income tax purposes but for the fact that such taxpayer is a nonresident alien, shall determine tax pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.    For the purposes of this section, for taxable year 2018, withholding by every employer from salaries, wages and other remuneration paid by an employer for services rendered described in subsections a. and b. of this section, in excess of $5,000,000 during that taxable year, shall be at the rate of 15.6% as soon as practicable but no later than September 1, 2018. The Director of the Division of Taxation is authorized to do all things necessary to implement the withholding tax prescribed by this section for taxable year 2018. e.     No additions to tax or penalty shall be imposed under N.J.S.54A:9-6 for insufficient payment of estimated tax that may otherwise be due on salaries, wages and other remuneration received before September 1, 2018, on which there is a rate of tax imposed pursuant to subsections a. and b. of this section. f.     An employer maintaining an office or transacting business within this State and making payment of any salaries, wages and remuneration subject to New Jersey gross income tax or making payment of any remuneration for employment subject to contribution under the New Jersey "unemployment compensation law," pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., that is subject to New Jersey gross income tax shall not be subject to interest, penalties or other costs that may otherwise be imposed for insufficient withholding of salaries, wages and other remuneration made before September 1, 2018, that is directly attributable to the enactment of the taxable income tables and tax rates in subsections a. and b. of this section. (cf: P.L.2020, c.94, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.